lex1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Verb +1PSg +2PSg +3PSg +1PPl +2PPl +3PPl +Auto
+Pres +Past +Fut +Con +Imperf +PresHab 
^Verb ^Séimhiú ^Root ^igh ^aigh ^Irreg

LEXICON Root
	Verbs;
LEXICON broad-1			! one syllable broad
+Verb+Pres:0 			broad-1-pres;
+Verb+Past:0			broad-1-past;
+Verb+Fut:0				broad-1-fut;
+Verb+Fut:0				broad-1-con;
+Verb+Imperf:0			broad-1-imperf;

LEXICON ending-aigh 		
0:^aigh					broad-2;

LEXICON broad-2			! two syllable broad
+Verb+Pres:0			broad-2-pres;
+Verb+Past:0 			broad-2-past;
+Verb+Fut:0 			broad-2-fut;
+Verb+Con:0				broad-2-con;
+Verb+Imperf:0			broad-2-imperf;


LEXICON slender-1		! one syllable slender
+Verb+Pres:0 			slender-1-pres;
+Verb+Past:0 			slender-1-past;
+Verb+Fut:0 			slender-1-fut;
+Verb+Con:0				slender-1-con;
+Verb+Imperf:0			slender-1-imperf;

LEXICON ending-igh			
0:^igh					slender-2;

LEXICON slender-2		! two syllable slender
+Verb+Pres:0			slender-2-pres;
+Verb+Past:0			slender-2-past;
+Verb+Fut:0				slender-2-fut;
+Verb+Con:0				slender-2-con;
+Verb+Imperf:0			slender-2-imperf;


LEXICON broad-1-pres
+1Psg:aim 					#;
+2Psg:ann					#;
+3Psg:ann					#;
+1PPl:aimid					#;
+2PPl:ann					#;
+3PPl:ann					#;
+Auto:tar 					#;

LEXICON broad-1-past
+1PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:amar^Séimhiú			#;
+2PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#; 
+Auto:adh 					#;

LEXICON broad-1-fut
+1PSg:faidh					#;
+2PSg:faidh					#;
+3PSg:faidh					#;
+1PPl:faimid				#;
+2PPl:faidh					#;
+3PPl:faidh					#;
+Auto:far 					#;

LEXICON broad-1-con
+1PSg:fainn^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:fá^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:fadh^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:faimis^Séimhiú		#;
+2PPl:fadh^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:faidís^Séimhiú		#;
+Auto:faí^Séimhiú			#;

LEXICON broad-1-imperf
+1Psg:ainn 					#;
+2Psg:tá					#;
+3Psg:adh					#;
+1PPl:aimis					#;
+2PPl:adh					#;
+3PPl:aidís					#;
+Auto:taí 					#;

LEXICON broad-2-pres
+1PSg:aím					#;
+2PSg:aíonn 				#;
+3PSg:aíonn 				#;
+1PPl:aímid					#;
+2PPl:aíonn 				#;
+3PPl:aíonn 				#;
+Auto:aítear 				#;

LEXICON broad-2-past
+1PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:aíomar^Séimhiú		#;
+2PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#; 
+Auto:aíodh 				#;

LEXICON broad-2-fut
+1PSg:óidh					#;
+2PSg:óidh					#;
+3PSg:óidh					#;
+1PPl:óimid					#;
+2PPl:óidh					#;
+3PPl:óidh					#;
+Auto:ófar 					#;

LEXICON broad-2-con
+1PSg:óinn^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:ófá^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:ódh^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:óimis^Séimhiú			#;
+2PPl:ódh^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:óidís^Séimhiú			#;
+Auto:ófaí^Séimhiú 			#;

LEXICON broad-2-imperf
+1Psg:inn 					#;
+2Psg:teá					#;
+3Psg:eadh					#;
+1PPl:imis					#;
+2PPl:eadh					#;
+3PPl:idís					#;
+Auto:tí 					#;

LEXICON slender-1-pres
+1Psg:im 					#;
+2Psg:eann					#;
+3Psg:eann					#;
+1PPl:imid					#;
+2PPl:eann					#;
+3PPl:eann					#;
+Auto:tear 					#;

LEXICON slender-1-past
+1PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:eamar^Séimhiú		#;
+2PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#; 
+Auto:eadh 					#;

LEXICON slender-1-fut
+1PSg:fidh					#;
+2PSg:fidh					#;
+3PSg:fidh					#;
+1PPl:fimid					#;
+2PPl:fidh					#;
+3PPl:fidh					#;
+Auto:fear 					#;

LEXICON slender-1-con
+1PSg:finn^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:feá^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:feadh^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:fimis^Séimhiú			#;
+2PPl:feadh^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:fidís^Séimhiú			#;
+Auto:fí^Séimhiú 			#;

LEXICON slender-1-imperf
+1Psg:aínn 					#;
+2Psg:aíteá					#;
+3Psg:aíodh					#;
+1PPl:aímis					#;
+2PPl:aíodh					#;
+3PPl:aídís					#;
+Auto:aítí 					#;

LEXICON slender-2-pres
+1PSg:ím					#;
+2PSg:íonn 					#;
+3PSg:íonn 					#;
+1PPl:ímid					#;
+2PPl:íonn 					#;
+3PPl:íonn 					#;
+Auto:ítear 				#;

LEXICON slender-2-past
+1PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:íomar^Séimhiú		#;
+2PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:^Root^Séimhiú			#; 
+Auto:íodh 					#;

LEXICON slender-2-fut
+1PSg:eoidh					#;
+2PSg:eoidh					#;
+3PSg:eoidh					#;
+1PPl:eoimid				#;
+2PPl:eoidh					#;
+3PPl:eoidh					#;
+Auto:eofar 				#;

LEXICON slender-2-con
+1PSg:eoinn^Séimhiú			#;
+2PSg:eofá^Séimhiú			#;
+3PSg:eodh^Séimhiú			#;
+1PPl:eoimis^Séimhiú		#;
+2PPl:eodh^Séimhiú			#;
+3PPl:eoidís^Séimhiú		#;
+Auto:eofaí^Séimhiú 		#;

LEXICON slender-2-imperf
+1Psg:ínn 					#;
+2Psg:íteá					#;
+3Psg:íodh					#;
+1PPl:ímis					#;
+2PPl:íodh					#;
+3PPl:ídís					#;
+Auto:ítí 					#;

LEXICON irreg-abair
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:deirim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:deir				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:deir				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:deirimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:deir				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:deir				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:deirtear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:dúirt				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:dúirt				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:dúirt				#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:dúramar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:dúirt				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:dúirt				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:dúradh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:déarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:déarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:déarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:déarfaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:déarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:déarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:déarfar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:déarfainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:déarfá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:déarfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:déarfaimis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:déarfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:déarfaidís			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:déarfaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:deirinn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:deirteá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:deireadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:deirimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:deireadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:deiridís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:deirtí			#;

LEXICON irreg-beir
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:beirim			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:beireann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:beireann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:beirimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:beireann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:beireann			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:béartear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:rug				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:rug				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:rug				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:rugamar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:rug				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:rug				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:rugadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:béarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:béarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:béarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:béarfaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:béarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:béarfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:béarfar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:bhéarfainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:bhéarfá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:bhéarfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:bhéarfaimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:bhéarfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:bhéarfaidís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:bhéarfaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:bheirinn		#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:bheirteá		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:bheireadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:bheirimis		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:bheireadh		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:bheiridís		#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:bheirtí			#;

LEXICON Verbs
bog				broad-1;				! to move
cas				broad-1;				! to turn
cead			broad-1;				! to permit
ceap			broad-1;				! to think
díol			broad-1;				! to sell
dún				broad-1;				! to close
fág				broad-1;				! to leave
fan				broad-1;				! to wait
féad			broad-1;				! to be able to
gearr			broad-1;				! to cut
glac			broad-1;				! to accept/handle
glan			broad-1;				! to clean
íoc				broad-1;				! to pay
las				broad-1;				! to light
leag			broad-1;				! to knock down
leath			broad-1;				! to spread
mol				broad-1;				! to praise
ól				broad-1;				! to drink
póg				broad-1;				! to kiss
réab			broad-1;				! to tear
scríobh			broad-1;				! to write
scuab			broad-1;				! to sweep
seas			broad-1;				! to stand
seiceáil		broad-1;				! to check *
siúil			broad-1;				! to walk *
stop			broad-1;				! to stop
teann			broad-1;				! to tighten
tóg				broad-1;				! to take/build
labhair			broad-2;				! to speak
oscail			broad-2;				! to open
bain			slender-1;				! to take out
bris			slender-1;				! to break
buail			slender-1;				! to hit/meet
caill			slender-1;				! to lose
caith			slender-1;				! to throw/spend/wear
creid			slender-1;				! to believe
croith			slender-1;				! to shake
cuir			slender-1;				! to put
doirt			slender-1;				! to pour
druid			slender-1;				! to shut
éist			slender-1;				! to listen
fill 			slender-1;				! to return
gluais			slender-1;				! to move
léim			slender-1;				! to jump
light			slender-1;				! to let
rith			slender-1;				! to run
ruaig			slender-1;				! to chase
scaoil			slender-1;				! to release
síl				slender-1;				! to consider
sméid			slender-1;				! to beckon
teith			slender-1;				! to flee
tit				slender-1;				! to fall
tuig			slender-1;				! to understand
tréig			slender-1;				! to abandon		
aithin			slender-2;				! to recognise
cuimil			slender-2;				! to rub
inis			slender-2;				! to tell
tarraing 		slender-2;				! to pull/draw
ardaigh			ending-aigh;			! to raise
athraigh		ending-aigh;			! to change
beartaigh		ending-aigh;			! to cast/poise
breathnaigh		ending-aigh;			! to observe/examine
ceannaigh 		ending-aigh; 			! to buy
críochnaigh 	ending-aigh;			! to finish
cuardaigh		ending-aigh;			! to search
cúlaigh			ending-aigh;			! to move back/reverse
damhsaigh		ending-aigh;			! to dance
fiafraigh		ending-aigh;			! to ask
laghdaigh		ending-aigh;			! to lessen/reduce
maraigh			ending-aigh;			! to kill
marcaigh		ending-aigh;			! to ride
mothaigh		ending-aigh;			! to feel
rialaigh		ending-aigh;			! to rule
roghnaigh		ending-aigh;			! to choose
sleamhnaigh 	ending-aigh;			! to slide/slip
sruthlaigh		ending-aigh;			! to rinse
tosaigh			ending-aigh;			! to start	
trasnaigh		ending-aigh;			! to traverse/cross
aimsigh			ending-igh;				! to aim
airigh			ending-igh;				! to perceive
bailigh 		ending-igh; 			! to collect
cinntigh		ending-igh;				! to confirm
coinnigh		ending-igh;				! to keep
cruinnigh		ending-igh;				! to gather
cuidigh			ending-igh;				! to share
cuimhnigh		ending-igh;				! to remember
deisigh			ending-igh;				! to mend
dírigh			ending-igh;				! to straighten
dúisigh			ending-igh;				! to wake up
éirigh			ending-igh;				! to rise
guigh			ending-igh;				! to pray
imigh			ending-igh;				! to go
ísligh			ending-igh;				! to lower
oibrigh			ending-igh;				! to work
smaoinigh		ending-igh;				! to think
suigh			ending-igh;				! to sit
irreg-abair;			! to say
irreg-beir;				! to catch
